Connecticut, session 2026, SB00267.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Insurance Commissioner shall
2 conduct a study concerning various revisions to the insurance statutes.
3 Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report,
4 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
5 to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
6 cognizance of matters relating to insurance on the results and
7 recommendations of such study.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
INS Joint Favorable
SB267 / File No. 205 1

SB267 File No. 205
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Insurance Department to study various revisions
to the insurance statutes and results in no fiscal impact as the
department has the expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
SB267 / File No. 205 2

SB267 File No. 205
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 267
AN ACT CONCERNING VARIOUS REVISIONS TO THE INSURANCE
STATUTES.